Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.100

Surety bonds for appointive state officers and employees.

Every appointive state officer and employee of the state shall give a surety bond, payable to the state in such sum as shall be deemed necessary by the director of the department of enterprise services, conditioned for the honesty of the officer or employee and for the accounting of all property of the state that shall come into his or her possession by virtue of his or her office or employment, which bond shall be approved as to form by the attorney general and shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

The director of enterprise services may purchase one or more blanket surety bonds for the coverage required in this section.

Any bond required by this section shall not be considered an official bond and shall not be subject to chapter 42.08 RCW.

[ 2015 c 225 s 63; 2009 c 549 s 5062; 1977 ex.s. c 270 s 7; 1975 c 40 s 6; 1965 c 8 s 43.17.100. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 16; RRS s 10774.]

NOTES:

Official bonds: Chapter 42.08 RCW.

Powers and duties of director of enterprise services as to official bonds: RCW 43.19.784.